Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 36 O.S. 2021, Section 3634.3, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 3634.3. A. A health insurance plan or policy or health
maintenance organization providing prescription drugs as a covered
benefit shall provide a pharmacy or group of pharmacies with the
right to bid on a periodic basis, but not less than every three (3)
years, on any pharmacy contract to provide pharmacy services,
including, but not limited to, prescription drugs and compound
prescription drugs.
B. Nothing in this act shall be interpreted to preclude a
health insurance plan or policy or health maintenance organization
from establishing an open pharmacy network for the provision of
Req. No. 15754 Page 1

phar macy services, including, but not limited to, prescription drugs
and compound prescription drugs.
C. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a health
insurance plan or policy or health maintenance organization that
maintains an open pharmacy network.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15754 TJ 01/05/26
















Req. No. 15754 Page 2